District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

29A-301.38

Effect of certificate of amendment.

Repealed.

Aug. 6, 1962, 76 Stat. 278, Pub. L. 87-569, § 38
July 2, 2011, D.C. Law 18-378, § 3(l), 58 DCR 1720

History

2001 Ed., § 29-301.38.
1981 Ed., § 29-539.
1973 Ed., § 29-1038.

Prior Codifications